Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2393.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4 of the act of September 30, 1983 (P.L.160, No.39), known as the Public Official Compensation Law, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 4. Members of the General Assembly.* * *(e) Health insurance benefits.--(1) A member of the House of Representatives is eligible to receive health insurance benefits only for such time as the member remains in office and, if the member is reelected 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 to the office of Representative in the General Assembly, during the interim between legislative sessions.(2) As used in this subsection, the term "health insurance benefits" means medical, dental, vision, prescription drug and long-term care insurance coverage, the cost of which is paid by the Commonwealth on behalf of a member of the House of Representatives or any spouse or other qualified adult or dependent of the member.Section 2. The addition of section 4(e) of the act shall apply to all members of the House of Representatives identified under section 4(a) and (b)(2) of the act who are elected to their respective offices after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2393PN3213 - 2 - 1234567891011121314